spelling/ortho-rule.xfst
# -*- coding: utf-8 -*-
################################################################################
# University of Zurich - Institute of Computational Linguistics
# Morphology anlysis for Romansh: Orthographic Rules and Capitalization
# Author: Reto Baumgartner
# Date: June 2013
################################################################################

################################################################################
# Alphabets
################################################################################

define BackVowel [a|o|u|à|á|â|ã|å|ò|ó|ô|õ|ù|ú|û];
define FrontVowel [e|i|y|ä|æ|è|é|ê|ë|ì|í|î|ï|ö|ø|ü|ý|ÿ|œ];
define Consonant [b|c|d|e|f|g|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|x|z|ç|ð|ñ|þ|š|ž];
define Letter [BackVowel|FrontVowel|Consonant];
define Char [Letter|{'}|{-}|{.}|{ß}|{’}|{´}|{`}];

################################################################################
# To write a hard 'g' or 'c' sound the letter h is set before e end i:
################################################################################

define VerbsWithoutHInsertion [{recognosc}|{confisc}];

define HardCG1 [ "@H" -> 0 || [{tg}|VerbsWithoutHInsertion] _ ];
define HardCG2 [ c c "@H" -> c h || _ FrontVowel ];
define HardCG3 [ "@H" -> h || [c|g] _ FrontVowel ];
define HardCG4 [ "@H" -> 0 ];
define HardCG [HardCG1 .o. HardCG2 .o. HardCG3 .o. HardCG4];

define SoftCG1 [ "@I" -> 0 || {tg} _ ];
define SoftCG2 [ "@I" -> i || [c|g] _ BackVowel ];
define SoftCG3 [ "@I" -> i || {gl} _ [BackVowel|e|y|ä|æ|è|é|ê|ë|ö|ø|ü|ý|ÿ|œ]];
define SoftCG4 [ "@I" -> 0 ];
define SoftCG [SoftCG1 .o. SoftCG2 .o. SoftCG3 .o. SoftCG4];

define VelarPalatalRule [HardCG .o. SoftCG];

################################################################################
# Apostrophe
################################################################################

# The apostrophe is not always encoded the same way. The tool will recognize
# several ways.
define Apostrophe ["'" (->) "’" , "'" (->) "´" , "'" (->) "`"];

################################################################################
# Capitalization
################################################################################

# The rules for the capitalization restrict the vocabulary.
# Thus it must be united with the non-capitalized forms. 
# As other combinations may mostly appear in names and brands, it is enough.

define UpperCase ["*" a -> A , "*" b -> B , "*" c -> C ,
                  "*" d -> D , "*" e -> E , "*" f -> F,
                  "*" g -> G , "*" h -> H , "*" i -> I ,
                  "*" j -> J , "*" k -> K , "*" l -> L ,
                  "*" m -> M , "*" n -> N , "*" o -> O ,
                  "*" p -> P , "*" q -> Q , "*" r -> R ,
                  "*" s -> S , "*" t -> T , "*" u -> U ,
                  "*" v -> V , "*" w -> W , "*" x -> X ,
                  "*" y -> Y , "*" z -> Z ,
                  "*" à -> À , "*" á -> Á , "*" â -> Â ,
                  "*" ã -> Ã , "*" ä -> Ä , "*" å -> Å ,
                  "*" æ -> Æ , "*" ç -> Ç , "*" è -> È ,
                  "*" é -> É , "*" ê -> Ê , "*" ë -> Ë ,
                  "*" ì -> Ì , "*" í -> Í , "*" î -> Î ,
                  "*" ï -> Ï , "*" ð -> Ð , "*" ñ -> Ñ ,
                  "*" ò -> Ò , "*" ó -> Ó , "*" ô -> Ô ,
                  "*" õ -> Õ , "*" ö -> Ö , "*" ø -> Ø ,
                  "*" ù -> Ù , "*" ú -> Ú , "*" û -> Û ,
                  "*" ü -> Ü , "*" ý -> Ý , "*" þ -> Þ ,
                  "*" ÿ -> Ÿ , "*" š -> Š , "*" ž -> Ž ,
                  "*" œ -> Œ ];

################################################################################
# Saving Networks
################################################################################

read regex UpperCase;
save stack fstbinaries/Capitalization.fst
clear stack

read regex Apostrophe .o. VelarPalatalRule;
save stack fstbinaries/OrthoRule.fst
clear stack
